Oklahoma, session 2026, SB2150.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 4 O.S. 2021, Section 30.2, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 30.2. As used in the Commercial Pet Breeders and Animal


Shelter Licensing Act:


1. “Adult animal” means an intact female animal twelve (12)


nine (9) months of age or older;


2. “Animal” means a dog or a cat, including a puppy or kitten;


3. “Animal shelter” means any nongovernmental facility that


maintains ten or more dogs and cats operated by or under contract


for the state, a county, a municipal corporation, or any other

Req. No. 2702 Page 1


political subdivision of the state for the purpose of impounding or


harboring seized, stray, homeless, abandoned or unwanted dogs or


cats; and any facility that maintains ten or more dogs and cats


operated, owned, or maintained by any person or organization for


such purpose, but not including any facility that does not house or


harbor dogs or cats on the premises and only operates through a


system of fostering in private homes;


4. “Animal shelter operator” means any individual, entity,


association, trust, or corporation that operates a nongovernmental


facility that maintains ten or more dogs and cats for the purpose of


impounding or harboring seized, stray, homeless, abandoned or


unwanted dogs or cats, but not including any facility that does not


house or harbor dogs or cats on the premises and only operates


through a system of fostering in private homes;


5. “Board” means the State Board of Agriculture;


6. “Cat” means a mammal that is wholly or partly of the species


Felis domesticus;


7. “Commercial breeder” and “commercial pet breeder” mean any


individual, entity, association, trust, or corporation who possesses


eleven or more intact female animals for the use of breeding or


dealing in animals for direct or indirect sale or for exchange in


return for consideration;





Req. No. 2702 Page 2


8. “Commercial pet breeder license” means a license issued to


any person that qualifies and is licensed as a commercial pet


breeder;


9. “Animal shelter license” means a license issued to any


applicant that qualifies and is licensed as an animal shelter


operator;


10. “Department” means the Oklahoma Department of Agriculture,


Food, and Forestry;


11. “Dog” means a mammal that is wholly or partly of the


species Canis familiaris;


12. “Facility” means the premises used by one or more animal


shelter operators or commercial breeders. The term includes all


buildings, property, and confinement areas in a single location used


to conduct the animal shelter or commercial breeding business;


13. “Family member” means the parent, spouse, child, or sibling


of an individual;


14. “Humane society” means a nonprofit organization exempt from


federal income taxation as an organization described in Section


501(c)(3), Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, that has as a


principal purpose the prevention of animal cruelty or the sheltering


of, caring for, and providing of homes for lost, stray, and


abandoned animals;





Req. No. 2702 Page 3


15. “Inspector” means an authorized agent of the Board or any


other qualified person authorized by the Department to conduct


inspections;


16. “Intact female animal” means a female animal, nine (9)


months of age or older, and not spayed;


17. “Kitten” means a cat less than twelve (12) nine (9) months


old;


18. “Local animal control authority” means a municipal or


county animal control office with authority over the premises in


which an animal is kept or, in an area that does not have an animal


control office, the county sheriff;


19. “Marketing” means the solicitation for sale of animals;


20. “Noncommercial breeder” means any individual, entity,


association, trust, or corporation who possesses ten or fewer intact


female animals for the use of breeding or dealing in animals for


direct or indirect sale or for exchange in return for consideration;


21. “Person” means any individual, association, trust,


corporation, limited liability company, partnership, or other


entity;


22. “Pet” means a dog or cat, including a puppy or kitten, that


is privately owned and not available for adoption, sale, or transfer


of any kind;


23. “Possess” means to have custody of or control over, but


shall not include custody or control over an animal by a person who

Req. No. 2702 Page 4


is not a resident of this state and is in this state for the sole


purpose of attending a competitive show or event held in this state;


24. “Puppy” means a dog less than twelve (12) nine (9) months


old; and


25. “Veterinarian” means a person currently licensed to


practice veterinary medicine in Oklahoma this state.


SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 4 O.S. 2021, Section 30.5, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 30.5. A. The Oklahoma Department of Agriculture, Food,


and Forestry may contract with a local veterinarian licensed by the


state, other state agency, or any other qualified person to conduct


or assist in an initial prelicense inspection and annual


inspections.


B. The Department shall arrange for an a prelicense inspection


at a facility prior to issuance of an initial animal shelter or


commercial pet breeder license for that facility.


1. The Department shall not issue an animal shelter or


commercial pet breeder license to any person until the Department


receives an initial prelicense inspection report from the inspector


in a format approved by the Department certifying that the facility


meets the requirements of the Commercial Pet Breeders and Animal


Shelter Licensing Act.


2. Prior to the initial prelicense inspection, each applicant


shall pay to the Department a nonrefundable inspection fee.

Req. No. 2702 Page 5


C. The Department, at least annually, shall arrange for the


inspection of each facility of a licensed animal shelter operator or


commercial breeder. The inspection shall be conducted during normal


business hours and the animal shelter operator, commercial breeder


or a representative of the facility shall be present during the


inspection The Board shall promulgate rules as necessary to conduct


at a minimum an annual inspection at each animal shelter or


commercial breeder to administer the Commercial Pet Breeders and


Animal Shelter Licensing Act.


D. The inspector shall submit an inspection report to the


Department not later than ten (10) days after the date of the


inspection on a form prescribed by the Department and provide a copy


of the report to the animal shelter operator, commercial breeder, or


the representative.


E. On receipt of a valid written complaint alleging a violation


of the Commercial Pet Breeders and Animal Shelter Licensing Act, an


authorized agent of the State Board of Agriculture, a local animal


control authority, or an inspector designated by the Department may


investigate the alleged violation.


F. The Department shall not hire any humane society group or


member of any humane society group to perform any inspection


required by the Commercial Pet Breeders and Animal Shelter Licensing


Act.



Req. No. 2702 Page 6


SECTION 3. AMENDATORY 4 O.S. 2021, Section 30.7, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 30.7. The Oklahoma Department of Agriculture, Food, and


Forestry may deny a license, or renewal thereof, or revoke a license


of any applicant, animal shelter operator, or commercial pet breeder


who fails to meet the standards of animal care or fails to follow


the application process adopted by the Department, or if the person


any owner, operator, partner, or member with percentage ownership:


1. Is convicted of a crime involving animal cruelty;


2. Is convicted of violating the Commercial Pet Breeders and


Animal Shelter Licensing Act more than three times;


3. Is convicted of a type of felony specified by subparagraphs


a through pp of paragraph 2 of Section 571 of Title 57 of the


Oklahoma Statutes;


4. Is convicted of a felony punishable under the Oklahoma


Racketeer-Influenced and Corrupt Organizations Act; or


5. Has held or applied for a United States Department of


Agriculture license pursuant to the federal Animal Welfare Act and


whose license was suspended or revoked, or whose application was


refused due to the improper care of animals.


SECTION 4. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.




60-2-2702 YG 1/15/2026 1:48:45 PM



Req. No. 2702 Page 7